dev/determiner/determiner.ne.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- एस्तै; एस्तै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एस्तै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तैं; तैं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तैं__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- क्यै; क्यै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="क्यै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कल्; कल्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कल्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जस्ता; जस्ता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जस्ता__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यहि; त्यहि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यहि__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कुनै; कुनै; 2 -->
    <pardef n="कुनै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-कुनै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यस्; त्यस्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यस्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जत्रो; जत्र; 3 -->
    <pardef n="जत्र/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुकै; सुकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुकै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यसो; त्यसो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यसो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यिनी; यिनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यिनी__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कोहि; कोहि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कोहि__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यिनै; यिनै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यिनै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यिन्; यिन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यिन्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तेस; तेस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तेस__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यीनै; यीनै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यीनै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यीनी; यीनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यीनी__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कोही; कोही; 2 -->
    <pardef n="कोही__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-कोही</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निज; निज; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निज__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अरू; अरू; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अरू__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कत्ति; कत्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कत्ति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तहाँ; तहाँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तहाँ__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यही; त्यही; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यही__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- के-कस्तो; के-कस्तो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="के-कस्तो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जुन; जुन; 3 -->
    <pardef n="जुन__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकैं</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सो; सो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यती; त्यती; 2 -->
    <pardef n="त्यती__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जस्तो; जस्त; 9 -->
    <pardef n="जस्त/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>जे-ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>जे-ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोसुकै</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="f"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोसुकै</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जस्तै; जस्तै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जस्तै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जों; जों; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जों__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यस्को; त्यस्क; 2 -->
    <pardef n="त्यस्क/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="f"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="एस्तै"><i>एस्तै</i><par n="एस्तै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तैं"><i>तैं</i><par n="तैं__det"/></e>
    <e lm="क्यै"><i>क्यै</i><par n="क्यै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कल्"><i>कल्</i><par n="कल्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्ता"><i>जस्ता</i><par n="जस्ता__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यहि"><i>त्यहि</i><par n="त्यहि__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कुनै"><i>कुनै</i><par n="कुनै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यस्"><i>त्यस्</i><par n="त्यस्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जत्रो"><i>जत्र</i><par n="जत्र/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="सुकै"><i>सुकै</i><par n="सुकै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यसो"><i>त्यसो</i><par n="त्यसो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यिनी"><i>यिनी</i><par n="यिनी__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कोहि"><i>कोहि</i><par n="कोहि__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यिनै"><i>यिनै</i><par n="यिनै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यिन्"><i>यिन्</i><par n="यिन्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तेस"><i>तेस</i><par n="तेस__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यीनै"><i>यीनै</i><par n="यीनै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यीनी"><i>यीनी</i><par n="यीनी__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कोही"><i>कोही</i><par n="कोही__det"/></e>
    <e lm="निज"><i>निज</i><par n="निज__det"/></e>
    <e lm="अरू"><i>अरू</i><par n="अरू__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कत्ति"><i>कत्ति</i><par n="कत्ति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तहाँ"><i>तहाँ</i><par n="तहाँ__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यही"><i>त्यही</i><par n="त्यही__det"/></e>
    <e lm="के-कस्तो"><i>के-कस्तो</i><par n="के-कस्तो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जुन"><i>जुन</i><par n="जुन__det"/></e>
    <e lm="सो"><i>सो</i><par n="सो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यती"><i>त्यती</i><par n="त्यती__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्तो"><i>जस्त</i><par n="जस्त/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्तै"><i>जस्तै</i><par n="जस्तै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जों"><i>जों</i><par n="जों__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यस्को"><i>त्यस्क</i><par n="त्यस्क/ो__det"/></e>
